Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-331
Temporary or preliminary relief; other proceedings; actions authorized.

(1) If the commission concludes at any time following the filing of a complaint that prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, the commission may authorize a civil action for appropriate temporary or preliminary relief pending final disposition of the complaint under this section. Upon receipt of such an authorization, the Attorney General shall promptly commence and maintain such an action. Any temporary restraining order or other order granting preliminary or temporary relief shall be issued in accordance with sections 25-1062 to 25-1080. The commencement of a civil action under this section shall not affect the initiation or continuation of administrative proceedings under this section and section 20-336.

(2) Whenever the commission has reason to believe that a basis may exist for the commencement of proceedings against any respondent under subsection (1) or (3) of section 20-343 or for proceedings by any governmental licensing or supervisory authorities, the commission shall transmit the information upon which such belief is based to the Attorney General or to such authorities, as the case may be.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 32.